Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0902

Effect of dissociation.

(1) When a person is dissociated as a member:

(a) The person's right to participate as a member in the management and conduct of the limited cooperative association's activities and affairs terminates; and

(b) Subject to RCW 23.100.0903, any financial rights owned by the person in the person's capacity as a member immediately before dissociation are owned by the person as a transferee.

(2) A person's dissociation as a member does not of itself discharge the person from any debt, obligation, or other liability to the limited cooperative association or the other members which the person incurred while a member.

[ 2019 c 37 s 902.]